Hawaii statutes.
§467E-11 Renewals. (a) Every license
issued under this chapter shall be renewed triennially on or before June 30,
with the first renewal deadline occurring on June 30, 1998. Failure to renew a
license shall result in a forfeiture of the license. Licenses which have been
so forfeited may be restored within one year of the expiration date upon
payment of renewal and penalty fees, and in the case of audited licensees,
documentary proof of compliance of continuing education. Failure to restore a
forfeited license within one year of the date of its expiration shall result in
the automatic termination of the license and relicensure may be subject to the
person applying as a new applicant and satisfying again all licensing
requirements.

(b) Beginning with the renewal for the
licensing triennium commencing on July 1, 2013, through June 30, 2016, each
licensee shall:

(1) Pay all required fees; and

(2) Complete a minimum of fifteen credit hours of
continuing education courses within the renewal period; provided that a minimum
of three credit hours shall be in ethic courses.

(c) Beginning with the renewal for the
licensing triennium commencing on July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2019, and
prior to every triennial renewal thereafter, each licensee shall:

(1) Pay all required fees; and

(2) Complete a minimum of forty-five credit hours of
continuing education courses within the three-year period preceding the renewal
date; provided that a minimum of three credit hours shall be in ethic courses.

(d) A first-time licensee shall not be subject
to the continuing education requirement for the first license renewal.

(e) Each licensee shall maintain the
licensee's continuing education records. At the time of renewal, each licensee
shall certify under oath that the licensee has complied with the continuing
education requirement of this section. The director may require a licensee to
submit evidence satisfactory to the director that demonstrates compliance with
the continuing education requirement of this section.

(f) The director may conduct random audits of
licensees to determine compliance with the continuing education requirement.
The director shall provide written notice of an audit to a licensee randomly
selected for audit. Within sixty days of notification, the licensee shall
provide the director with documentation verifying compliance with the
continuing education requirement established by this section. [L 1994, c 251,
pt of §2; am L 2013, c 183, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next